North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 1. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees.
§ 135-10.
Protection against fraud.

Any person who shall knowingly make any false statement or shall falsify or permit to be falsified any record or records of this Retirement System in any attempt to defraud such System as a result of such act shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.
Should any change or error in the records result in any member or beneficiary receiving from the Retirement System more or less than he would have been entitled to receive had the records been correct, the Board of Trustees shall correct
such error, and as far as practicable, shall adjust the payment in such a manner that the actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which such member or beneficiary was correctly entitled shall be paid.

History.
1941, c. 25, s. 10; 1993, c. 539, s. 973; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 135-10.1.
Failure to respond.

If a member fails to respond within 120 days after preliminary option figures and the Form 6-E or Form 7-E are transmitted to the member, or if a member fails to respond within 120 days after the effective date of retirement, whichever is later, the Form
6 or Form 7 shall be null and void; the retirement system shall not be liable for any benefits due on account of the voided application, and a new application must be filed establishing a subsequent effective date of retirement. If
an applicant for disability retirement fails to furnish requested additional medical information within 90 days following such request, the application shall be declared null and void under the same conditions outlined above, unless
the applicant is eligible for early or service retirement in which case the application shall be processed accordingly, using the same effective date as would have been used had the application for disability retirement been approved.
The Director of the Retirement Systems Division, acting on behalf of the Board of Trustees, may extend the 120-day limitation provided for in this section when a member has suffered incapacitation such that a reasonable person would
not have expected the member to be able to complete the required paperwork within the regular deadline, or when an omission by the Retirement Systems Division prevents the member from having sufficient time to meet the regular deadline.

History.
2005-91, s. 4; 2009-66, s. 4(b); 2010-72, s. 6(a); 2016-108, s. 3(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-66, s. 4(b), effective July 1, 2009, in the first sentence, substituted “the Form 6-E are mailed, the Form 6 shall” for “Form 6-E, Election of Benefits, are mailed, the Form 6, Application for Service, Early, or Disability Retirement,
shall”, and added the last sentence.

Session Laws 2010-72, s. 6(a), effective July 1, 2010, in the first sentence, substituted “respond within 120 days” for “respond in any way within 90 days” and substituted “Form 6-E or Form 7-E are mailed, or if a member fails to respond within 120 days
after the effective date of retirement, whichever is late, the Form 6 or Form 7 shall” for “Form 6-E are mailed, the Form 6 shall”; and, in the last sentence, substituted “120-day limitation” for “90-day limitation.”

Session Laws 2016-108, s. 3(a), effective July 22, 2016, in the first sentence, substituted “transmitted to the member” for “mailed.”

§ 135-11.
Application of other pension laws.

Subject to the provisions of Article 2, Chapter 135 of the General Statutes, Volume 17, as amended, no other provisions of law in any other statute which provides wholly or partly at the expense of the State of North Carolina for pensions or retirement
benefits for teachers or State employees of the said State, their widows, or other dependents shall apply to members or beneficiaries of the Retirement System established by this Chapter, their widows or other dependents.

History.
1941, c. 25, s. 11; 1955, c. 1155, s. 6.

§ 135-12.
Obligation of maintaining reserves and paying benefits.

The maintenance of annuity reserves and pension reserves as provided for and regular interest creditable to the various funds as provided in

G.S. 135-8

, and the payment of all pensions, annuities, retirement allowances, refunds and other benefits granted under the provisions of this Chapter, are hereby made obligations of the pension accumulation fund. All income, interest
and dividends derived from deposits and investments authorized by this Chapter shall be used for the payment of the said obligations of the said fund.

History.
1941, c. 25, s. 12.

§ 135-13.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-48, s. 1.12(b), effective June 26, 2020.

History.
1941, c. 25, s. 13; repealed by 2020-48, s. 1.12(b), effective June 26, 2020.

§ 135-14.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-48, s. 1.12(c), effective June 26, 2020.

History.
1943, c. 785; 1953, c. 1132, s. 1; 1955, c. 1199, ss. 1, 2; 1957, cc. 852, 1408, 1412; 1959, c. 538, s. 1; 1979, c. 1057, ss. 1, 2; 1983, c. 761, s. 223; repealed by 2020-48, s. 1.12(c), effective June 26, 2020.

§ 135-14.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-48, s. 1.12(d), effective June 26, 2020.

History.
1957, c. 1431; repealed by 2020-48, s. 1.12(d), effective June 26, 2020.

§ 135-15.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1949, c. 1056, s. 9.

§ 135-16.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-48, s. 1.12(e), effective June 26, 2020.

History.
1947, c. 464, s. 1; c. 598, s. 1; 2011-401, s. 3.17; repealed by 2020-48, s. 1.12(e), effective June 26, 2020.

§ 135-16.1.
Blind or visually impaired vendors.

Persons licensed by the State and operating vending facilities under contract with the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Services for the Blind and its successors, who are licensed on and after October 1, 1983, shall not be members
of the Retirement System.

History.
1971, c. 1025, s. 3; 1973, c. 476, s. 143; 1983, c. 867, s. 3; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2000-121, s. 28; 2020-48, s. 1.13.

§ 135-17.
Facility of payment.

In the event of the death of a member or beneficiary not survived by a person designated to receive any return of accumulated contributions or balance thereof, or in the event that the Board of Trustees shall find that a beneficiary is unable to care
for his affairs because of illness or accident, any benefit payments due may, unless claim shall have been made therefor by a duly appointed guardian, committee or other legal representative, be paid to the spouse, a child, a parent
or other blood relative, or to any person deemed by the Board of Trustees to have incurred expense for such beneficiary or deceased member, and any such payments so made shall be a complete discharge of the liabilities of this Retirement
System therefor.

History.
1949, c. 1056, s. 6.

§ 135-18.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1969, c. 1223, s. 14.

§ 135-18.1.
Transfer of credits from the North Carolina Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System.

Prior to retirement, any person who was a member of the North Carolina Governmental Employees’ Retirement System and who becomes a member of this Retirement System shall be entitled to transfer to this Retirement System his or her credits for membership
and prior service in the local system: Provided, the local system agrees to transfer to this Retirement System the amount of reserve held in the local system as a result of previous contributions of the employer on behalf of the
transferring employee. For the purposes of this section, the term “local system” means the North Carolina Governmental Employees’ Retirement System.

The accumulated contributions withdrawn from the local system and deposited in this Retirement System shall be credited to such member’s account in the annuity savings fund of this Retirement System and shall be deemed, for the purpose of computing any
benefits subsequently payable from the annuity savings fund, to be regular contributions made on the date of such deposit.

Upon the deposit in this Retirement System of the accumulated contributions previously withdrawn from the local system the Board of Trustees of this Retirement System shall request the Board of Trustees of the local system to certify to the period of
membership service credit and the regular accumulated contributions attributable thereto and to the period of prior service credit, if any, and the contributions with interest allowable as a basis for prior service benefits in
the local system, as of the date of termination of membership in the local system. Credit shall be allowed in this System for the service so certified in determining the member’s credited service and, upon his retirement he shall
be entitled, in addition to the regular benefits allowable on account of his participation in this Retirement System, to the pension which shall be the actuarial equivalent at age 65 or at retirement, if prior thereto, of the amount
of the credit with interest thereon representing contributions attributable to his service credits in the local system.

The Board of Trustees of the Retirement System shall effect such rules as it may deem necessary to prevent any duplication of service, interest or other credits which might otherwise occur.

History.
1951, c. 797; 1961, c. 516, s. 7; 1965, c. 780, s. 1; 1969, c. 1223, s. 15; 1971, c. 117, ss. 16, 17; 1973, c. 241, s. 11; 2020-48, s. 1.11.

§ 135-18.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1959, c. 538, s. 3.

§ 135-18.3.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-48, s. 1.12(f), effective June 26, 2020.

History.
1955, c. 1155, s. 7; repealed by 2020-48, s. 1.12(f), effective June 26, 2020.

§ 135-18.4.
Reservation of power to change.

The General Assembly reserves the right at any time and from time to time, and if deemed necessary or appropriate by said General Assembly in order to coordinate with any changes, in the benefit and other provisions of the Social Security Act made after
January 1, 1955, to modify or amend in whole or in part any or all of the provisions of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System of North Carolina.

History.
1955, c. 1155, s. 8.

§ 135-18.5.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-48, s. 1.12(g), effective June 26, 2020.

History.
1955, c. 1155, s. 9; 1957, c. 855, s. 9; repealed by 2020-48, s. 1.12(g), effective June 26, 2020.

§ 135-18.6.
Termination or partial termination; discontinuance of contributions.

In the event of the termination or partial termination of the Retirement System or in the event of complete discontinuance of contributions under the Retirement System, the rights of all affected members to benefits accrued to the date of such termination,
partial termination, or discontinuance, to the extent funded as of such date, or the amounts credited to the members’ accounts, shall be nonforfeitable and fully vested.

History.
1987, c. 177, s. 1(a), (b).

§ 135-18.7.
Internal Revenue Code compliance.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, compensation for any calendar year after 1988 in which employee or employer contributions are made and for which annual compensation is used for computing any benefit under this Article shall
not exceed the higher of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) or the amount determined by the Commissioner of Internal Revenue as the limitation for calendar years after 1989; provided the imposition of the limitation shall
not reduce a member’s benefit below the amount determined as of December 31, 1988.Effective January 1, 1996, the annual compensation of a member taken into account for determining all benefits provided under this Article shall
not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), as adjusted pursuant to section 401(a)(17)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code and any regulations issued under the Code. However, with respect to a person who became a member
of the Retirement System prior to January 1, 1996, the imposition of this limitation on compensation shall not reduce the amount of compensation which may be taken into account for determining the benefits of that member under
this Article below the amount of compensation which would have been recognized under the provisions of this Article in effect on July 1, 1993.Effective January 1, 2002, the annual compensation of a person, who became a member of
the Retirement System on or after January 1, 1996, taken into account for determining all benefits accruing under this Article for any plan year after December 31, 2001, shall not exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000)
or the amount otherwise set by the Internal Revenue Code or determined by the Commissioner of Internal Revenue as the limitation for calendar years after 2002.All the provisions in this subsection have been enacted to make clear
that the Plan shall not base contributions or Plan benefits on annual compensation in excess of the limits prescribed by Section 401(a)(17) of the Internal Revenue Code, as adjusted from time to time, subject to certain federal
grandfathering rules.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the annual benefit payable on behalf of a member shall, if necessary, be reduced to the extent required by Section 415(b) and with respect to calendar years commencing prior to January 1, 2000,
Section 415(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, as adjusted by the Secretary of the Treasury or his delegate pursuant to Section 415(d) of the Code. If a member is a participant under any qualified defined contributions plan that
is required to be taken into account for the purposes of the limitation contained in Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code, the annual benefit payable under this Article shall be reduced to the extent required by Section 415(e)
prior to making any reduction under the defined contribution plan provided by the employer. However, with respect to a member who has benefits accrued under this Article but whose benefit had not commenced as of December 31, 1999,
the combined plan limitation contained in Section 415(e) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not be applied to such member for calendar years commencing on or after January 1, 2000.

On and after September 8, 2009, and for all Plan years to which the minimum distribution rules of the Internal Revenue Code are applicable, with respect to any member who has terminated employment, the Plan shall comply with federal income tax minimum
distribution rules by applying a reasonable and good faith interpretation to Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code.

This subsection applies to distributions and rollovers from the Plan. The Plan does not have mandatory distributions within the meaning of Section 401(a)(31) of the Internal Revenue Code. With respect to distributions from the Plan and notwithstanding
any other provision of the Plan to the contrary that would otherwise limit a distributee’s election under this Article, a distributee (including, after December 31, 2006, a non-spouse beneficiary if that non-spouse beneficiary
elects a direct rollover only to an inherited traditional or Roth IRA as permitted under applicable federal law) may elect, at the time and in the manner prescribed by the Plan administrator, to have any portion of an eligible
rollover distribution paid directly to an eligible retirement plan specified by the distributee in a direct rollover. As used in this subsection, an “eligible retirement plan” means an individual retirement account described in
Section 408(a) of the Code, an individual retirement annuity described in Section 408(b) of the Code, an annuity plan described in Section 403(a) of the Code, on and after January 1, 2009, a Roth IRA, or a qualified trust described
in Section 401(a) of the Code, that accepts the distributee’s eligible rollover distribution. Effective on and after January 1, 2002, an eligible retirement plan also means an annuity contract described in Section 403(b) of the
Code and an eligible plan under Section 457(b) of the Code that is maintained by a state, political subdivision of a state, or any agency or instrumentality of a state or political subdivision of a state and which agrees to separately
account for amounts transferred into that plan from this Plan. As used in this subsection, a “direct rollover” is a payment by the Plan to the eligible retirement plan specified by the distributee. Provided, an eligible rollover
distribution is any distribution of all or any portion of the balance to the credit of the distributee, except that an eligible rollover distribution shall not include: any distribution that is one of a series of substantially
equal periodic payments (not less frequently than annually) made for the life (or life expectancy) of the distributee or the joint lives (or joint life expectancies) of the distributee and the distributee’s designated beneficiary,
or for a specified period of 10 years or more; any distribution to the extent such distribution is required under section 401(a)(9) of the Code; and the portion of any distribution that is not includible in gross income (determined
without regard to the exclusion for net realized appreciation with respect to employer securities). Effective as of January 1, 2002, and notwithstanding the exclusion of any after-tax portion from such a rollover distribution in
the preceding sentence, a portion of a distribution shall not fail to be an eligible rollover distribution merely because the portion consists of after-tax employee contributions which are not includible in gross income. That portion
may be transferred, pursuant to applicable federal law, to an individual retirement account or annuity described in Section 408(a) or (b) of the Code, to a qualified defined benefit plan, or to a qualified defined contribution
plan described in Section 401(a), 403(a), or 403(b) of the Code that agrees to separately account for amounts so transferred, including separately accounting for the portion of such distribution which is includible in gross income
and the portion of such distribution which is not so includible. The definition of eligible retirement plan shall also apply in the case of a distribution to surviving spouse, or to a spouse or former spouse who is the alternate
payee under a qualified domestic relations order, as defined in Section 414(p) of the Internal Revenue Code, or a court-ordered equitable distribution of marital property, as provided under

G.S. 50-20.1

. Effective on and after January 1, 2007, notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, a nonspouse beneficiary of a deceased member may elect, at the time and in the manner prescribed by the administrator
of the Board of Trustees of this Retirement System, to directly roll over any portion of the beneficiary’s distribution from the Retirement System; however, such rollover shall conform with the provisions of section 402(c)(11)
of the Code.

History.
1989, c. 276, s. 3; 1993, c. 531, s. 6; 1995, c. 361, s. 1; 2002-71, s. 6; 2009-66, s. 1(a); 2012-130, s. 4(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-66, s. 1(a), effective July 1, 2009, added the last sentence of subsection (d).

Session Laws 2012-130, s. 4(c), effective July 1, 2012, in subsection (a), added the third paragraph, and rewrote subsections (c) and (d).

§ 135-18.8.
Deduction for payments allowed.

Any beneficiary who is a member of a domiciled employees’ or retirees’ association that has at least 2,000 members, the majority of whom are active or retired employees of the State or public school employees, may authorize, in writing, the periodic deduction
from the beneficiary’s retirement benefits a designated lump sum to be paid to the employees’ or retirees’ association. The authorization shall remain in effect until revoked by the beneficiary. A plan of deductions pursuant to
this section shall become void if the employees’ or retirees’ association engages in collective bargaining with the State, any political subdivision of the State, or any local school administrative unit.

Any beneficiary may also authorize, in writing, the monthly deduction from the beneficiary’s retirement benefits of a designated lump sum to be paid to the State Health Plan for any dependent whom the beneficiary wishes to cover under the State Health
Plan. In the event that the beneficiary’s own State Health Plan coverage is contributory, in whole or in part, the beneficiary may also authorize a designated lump sum to be paid to the State Health Plan on behalf of the beneficiary.
In addition, a beneficiary may similarly authorize the deduction for supplemental voluntary insurance benefits, provided that the deduction is authorized by the Department of State Treasurer and is payable to a company with which
the Department of State Treasurer has or had an exclusive contractual relationship. Any such authorization shall remain in effect until revoked by the beneficiary.

History.
1998-212, s. 9.24(a); 1999-237, s. 23; 2002-126, s. 6.4(c); 2012-1, s. 2; 2012-178, s. 4(c); 2014-115, s. 62(a).

§ 135-18.9.
Transfer of members from the Legislative Retirement System or the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System.

The accumulated contributions, creditable service, and reserves, if any, of a member of the Legislative Retirement System, as provided for in Article 1A of G.S. 120, or the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System, as provided for in Article 4 of G.S.
135, who later becomes a member of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System for a period of five or more years may, upon application of the member, be transferred from the Legislative Retirement System or the Consolidated
Judicial Retirement System. The accumulated contributions, creditable service, and reserves of any member whose service as a member of the Legislative Retirement System or the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System is terminated
other than by retirement or death and who later becomes a member of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System may, upon application of the member, be transferred from the Legislative Retirement System or the Consolidated
Judicial Retirement System to the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System. In order to effect the transfer of a member’s creditable service from the Legislative Retirement System or the Consolidated Judicial Retirement
System to the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, the accumulated contributions of each member credited in the annuity savings fund in the Legislative Retirement System or the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System
shall be transferred and credited to the annuity savings fund in the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System.

The Board of Trustees shall effect such rules as it may deem necessary to administer subsection (a) of this section and to prevent any duplication of service credits or benefits that might otherwise occur.

History.
2003-284, s. 30.18(c).

§ 135-18.10.
Forfeiture of retirement benefits for certain felonies committed while serving as elected government official.

Except as provided in G.S. 135-4(gg), the Board of Trustees shall not pay any retirement benefits or allowances, except for a return of member contributions plus interest, to any member who is convicted of any felony under the federal laws listed in subsection
(b) of this section or the laws of this State listed in subsection (c) of this section if all of the following apply:

The federal or State offense is committed while serving as an elected government official.

The conduct on which the federal or State offense is based is directly related to the member’s service as an elected government official.

The federal offenses covered by this section are as follows:

A felony violation of 18 U.S.C. § 201 (Bribery of public officials and witnesses), 18 U.S.C. § 286 (Conspiracy to defraud the Government with respect to claims), 18 U.S.C. § 287 (False, fictitious or fraudulent claims), 18 U.S.C. § 371 (Conspiracy to
commit offense or to defraud United States), 18 U.S.C. § 597 (Expenditures to influence voting), 18 U.S.C. § 599 (Promise of appointment by candidate), 18 U.S.C. § 606 (Intimidation to secure political contributions), 18
U.S.C. § 641 (Public money, property, or records), 18 U.S.C. § 666 (Embezzlement and theft), 18 U.S.C. § 1001 (Statements or entries generally), 18 U.S.C. § 1341 (Frauds and swindles), 18 U.S.C. § 1343 (Fraud by wire, radio,
or television), 18 U.S.C. § 1503 (Influencing or injuring officer or juror generally), 18 U.S.C. § 1951 (Interference with commerce by threats or violence), 18 U.S.C. § 1952 (Interstate and foreign travel or transportation
in aid of racketeering enterprises), 18 U.S.C. § 1956 (Laundering of monetary instruments), 18 U.S.C. § 1962 (Prohibited activities), or section 7201 of the Internal Revenue Code (Attempt to evade or defeat tax).

Reserved for future codification purposes.

The offenses under the laws of this State covered by this section are as follows:

A felony violation of any of the following provisions of the General Statutes:

Article 29 of Chapter 14, Bribery.

Article 30 of Chapter 14, Obstructing Justice.

Article 30A of Chapter 14, Secret Listening.

G.S. 14-228

, Buying and selling offices.

Part 1 of Article 14 of Chapter 120, Code of Legislative Ethics.

Article 20 of Subchapter VII of Chapter 163, Absentee Ballot.

Article 22 of Subchapter VIII of Chapter 163, Regulation of Election Campaigns — Corrupt Practices and Other Offenses Against the Elective Franchise.

G.S. 14-90

, Embezzlement of property received by virtue of office or employment.

G.S. 14-91

, Embezzlement of State property by public officers and employees.

G.S. 14-92

, Embezzlement of funds by public officers and trustees.

G.S. 14-99

, Embezzlement of taxes by officers.

Subsection (a) of

G.S. 14-454.1

, Accessing government computers.

Subsection (a1) of

G.S. 14-455

, Damaging computers, computer programs, computer systems, computer networks, and resources.

G.S. 14-456.1

, Denial of government computer services to an authorized user.

Perjury or false information as follows:

Perjury committed under

G.S. 14-209

in falsely denying the commission of an act that constitutes an offense within the purview of an offense listed in subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of this section.

Subornation of perjury committed under

G.S. 14-210

in connection with the false denial of another as specified by subdivision (2) of this subsection.

Perjury under Article 22A of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.

All monies forfeited under this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund.

History.
2007-179, s. 3(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-84, s. 2(a); 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter
163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws
relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines,
internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “Part 1 of Article 21 or Article 22 of Chapter 163A” for “Article
20 or 22 of Chapter 163” in subdivision (c)(1), and substituted “Article 23 of Chapter 163A” for “Article 22A of Chapter 163” in sub-subdivision (c)(2)c.

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b) and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session
Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to the references in this section.

§ 135-18.10A.
Forfeiture of retirement benefits for certain felonies related to employment or holding office.

Except as provided in G.S. 135-4(ii), the Board of Trustees shall not pay any retirement benefits or allowances, except for a return of member contributions plus interest, to any member who is convicted of any felony under federal law or the laws of this
State if all of the following apply:

The offense is committed while the member is in service.

The conduct resulting in the member’s conviction is directly related to the member’s office or employment.

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-48, s. 4.3(a), effective June 26, 2020.

If a member or former member whose benefits under the System were forfeited under this section, except for the return of member contributions plus interest, subsequently receives an unconditional pardon of innocence, or the conviction is vacated or set
aside for any reason, then the member or former member may seek a reversal of the benefit forfeiture by presenting sufficient evidence to the State Treasurer. If the State Treasurer determines a reversal of the benefit forfeiture
is appropriate, then all benefits will be restored upon repayment of all accumulated contributions plus interest. Repayment of all accumulated contributions that have been received by the individual under the forfeiture provisions
of this section must be made in a total lump-sum payment with interest compounded annually at a rate of six and one-half percent (6.5%) for each calendar year from the year of forfeiture to the year of repayment. An individual
receiving a reversal of benefit forfeiture must receive reinstatement of the service credit forfeited.

History.
2012-193, s. 1; 2020-48, s. 4.3(a).

Cross References.

As to forfeiture of retirement benefits in the Legislative Retirement System for certain felonies related to employment or holding office, see

G.S. 120-4.33

A. As to forfeiture of retirement benefits for certain felonies related to public employment by or holding office in counties, cities, and towns, see

G.S. 128-38.4

A. As to forfeiture of retirement benefits under the Judicial Retirement Act for certain felonies related to employment or holding office, see

G.S. 135-75.1

A.

§ 135-18.10B.
Prohibition on purchase of forfeited service.

Any member whose retirement benefits have been forfeited under

G.S. 135-18.10

or

G.S. 135-18.10

A is prohibited from subsequently purchasing or repurchasing either those forfeited benefits or any creditable membership service associated with those forfeited benefits and that service may not be used for the purposes
of eligibility for benefits in any retirement system that provides reciprocal benefits.

History.
2018-52, s. 6(a); 2020-48, s. 4.5(a).

§ 135-18.11.
Improper receipt of decedent’s retirement allowance.

A person is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor if the person, with the intent to defraud, receives money as a result of cashing, depositing, or receiving a direct deposit of a decedent’s retirement allowance and the person (i) knows that he or she is not
entitled to the decedent’s retirement allowance, (ii) receives the benefit at least two months after the date of the retiree’s or beneficiary’s death, and (iii) does not attempt to inform this Retirement System of the retiree’s or
beneficiary’s death.

History.
2011-232, s. 10(a); 2012-185, s. 3(a); 2013-288, s. 9(b).